vec_IT/vec_IT.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi '-er inregolari ((r[ei])èser)
# themeT1 + er/b9
SFX b9 Y 369
SFX b9 0 e èser
SFX b9 0 ge èser
SFX b9 0 me/P6P7 èser
SFX b9 0 mene/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 er ar èser
SFX b9 er are èser
SFX b9 er arge èser
SFX b9 er arme/P6P7 èser
SFX b9 er armene/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 er i/P0P1P2P3P4P5I2I4 èser
SFX b9 er ime/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 er imene/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 ser ra/P3P4P5I0I4 èser
SFX b9 ser rane/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 ser rau/I5 èser
SFX b9 ser re/I0 èser
SFX b9 ser relo/A1 èser
SFX b9 ser rene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 ser reƚo/A1 èser
SFX b9 ser ri/I0I2I4 èser
SFX b9 ser rimo/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 ser rimoe/I1 èser
SFX b9 ser ritu/I3 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 ser ro/I0 èser
SFX b9 ser rone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser astando/P0P1P2 èser
SFX b9 èser astanto/P0P1P2 èser
SFX b9 èser astàndome/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser astàndomene/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser astàntome/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser astàntomene/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser eren/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser erene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser erense èser
SFX b9 èser erensi èser
SFX b9 èser erion/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser erione/I1 èser
SFX b9 èser erionme/P6P7 èser
SFX b9 èser eriven/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser erivene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser erivense èser
SFX b9 èser erivensi èser
SFX b9 èser erivion/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser erivione/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser erivionse èser
SFX b9 èser erivié/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser eriviéu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser erivon/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser erivone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser erivonse èser
SFX b9 èser erié/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser eriéu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser eriónmene/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser eron/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser erone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser eronme/P6P7 èser
SFX b9 èser erímoe/I1 èser
SFX b9 èser erónmene/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser esendo/P0P1P2 èser	ts:gerund_simple
SFX b9 èser esente/M0FSⱣd èser	ts:participle_active
SFX b9 èser esènte/M0FS èser	ts:participle_active
SFX b9 èser esento/P0P1P2FS èser
SFX b9 èser esènto/P0P1P2FS èser
SFX b9 èser esesto/A1FS èser
SFX b9 èser esudo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser eséndome/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser eséndomene/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser eséntome/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser eséntomene/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser esí/P0P1P2P3P4P5I2I4 èser
SFX b9 èser esú/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser étu/I3 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser furese/M0FS èser
SFX b9 èser furesen/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser furesene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser furesense èser
SFX b9 èser furesensi èser
SFX b9 èser furesiede/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser furesiege/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser furesion/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser furesione/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser furesionse èser
SFX b9 èser furesisen/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser furesisene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser furesisense èser
SFX b9 èser furesisensi èser
SFX b9 èser furesisiede/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser furesisiege/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser furesision/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser furesisione/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser furesisionse èser
SFX b9 èser furesisié/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser furesison/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser furesisone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser furesisonse èser
SFX b9 èser furesié/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser furesiéu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser fureson/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser furesone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser furesonse èser
SFX b9 èser furésimo/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser furésimoe/I1 èser
SFX b9 èser fuse/FSI6I7M0 èser
SFX b9 èser fusen/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser fusene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser fusense èser
SFX b9 èser fusensi èser
SFX b9 èser fusiede/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser fusiege/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser fusion/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser fusione/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser fusionse èser
SFX b9 èser fusisen/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser fusisene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser fusisense èser
SFX b9 èser fusisensi èser
SFX b9 èser fusisiede/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser fusisiege/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser fusision/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser fusisione/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser fusisionse èser
SFX b9 èser fusisié/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser fusison/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser fusisone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser fusisonse èser
SFX b9 èser fusié/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser fusiéu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser fuson/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser fusone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser fusonse èser
SFX b9 èser fúselo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser fúseƚo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser fúsimo/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser fúsimoe/I1 èser
SFX b9 èser jèra/P3P4P5I0I4 èser
SFX b9 èser jèrane/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser jèrau/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser jère/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser jèrelo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser jèreme/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser jèremene/P6P7P8 èser
SFX b9 èser jèrene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser jèreƚo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser jèri/I0I2I4 èser
SFX b9 èser jèrimo/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser jèrimone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser jèritu/I3 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser jèro/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser jèrone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser saràlo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser sarane/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser saràtu/I3 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser sarave/P3P4P5I8I9 èser	ts:conditional_present
SFX b9 èser saràƚo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser saremo/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser saren/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser saréne/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser sarimo/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sarié/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser sariéu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser saron/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sarone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser sarà/P3P4P5I0I2 èser
SFX b9 èser saràe/P3P4P5 èser	ts:conditional_present
SFX b9 èser saràvelo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser saràvene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser saràveƚo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser sarè/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sarène/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser saré/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser sarémoe/I1 èser
SFX b9 èser saréu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser sarí/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser saría/P4P5I0I2 èser
SFX b9 èser sarèe/P3P4P5I0I2 èser
SFX b9 èser saríane/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser saríatu/I3 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser saríe/P3P4P5I0I2 èser
SFX b9 èser saríelo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser saríene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser saríeƚo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser sarímoe/I1 èser
SFX b9 èser saríu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser sarò/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser saròe/I1 èser
SFX b9 èser sélo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser semo/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sen/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser sepi/P3P4P5I2 èser
SFX b9 èser sepia/P0P1P2 èser
SFX b9 èser sepie/P0P1P2P3P4P5I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sepiede/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser sepiege/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser sepiemo/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sepiemo/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sepien/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sepiene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser sepimo/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sepimo/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sepion/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sepione/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser sepiè/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser sepiène/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser sepié/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser sepiémoe/I1 èser
SFX b9 èser sepiéu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser sepí/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser seràlo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser serane/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser seràtu/I3 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser serave/P3P4P5I8I9 èser	ts:conditional_present
SFX b9 èser seràƚo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser seremo/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser seren/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser seréne/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser serense èser
SFX b9 èser serensi èser
SFX b9 èser seresi/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser seresiu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser serimo/P0P1P2I0 èser
SFX b9 èser serion/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser serione/I1 èser
SFX b9 èser serionse èser
SFX b9 èser serisen/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser serisene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser serisense èser
SFX b9 èser serisensi èser
SFX b9 èser serisi/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser serision/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser serisione/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser serisionse èser
SFX b9 èser serisiu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser serisié/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser serisiéu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser serison/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser serisone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser serisonse èser
SFX b9 èser serié/I4 èser
SFX b9 èser seriéu/I5 èser
SFX b9 èser seron/I0 èser
SFX b9 èser serone/I1 èser	is:interrogative
SFX b9 èser seronse èser
SFX b9 èser serà/P3P4P5I0I2 èser
SFX b9 èser seràe/P3P4P5 èser	ts:conditional_present
SFX b9 èser seràvelo/A1 èser
SFX b9 èser seràvene/I1 èser	is:interrogative
